Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-613
Cash Reserve Fund; investment; interest.

Any money in
the Cash Reserve Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest
earned by the fund shall accrue to the General Fund.

Laws 1983, LB 59, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 870, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 131, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 391, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 147;

Laws 2004, LB 1090, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1131, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1256, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB323, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB456, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.